District of Columbia statutes.
46-357.11

Modification of convention child-support order.

(a)

A tribunal of the District may not modify a Convention child-support order if the obligee remains a resident of the foreign country where the support order was issued unless:

(1)

The obligee submits to the jurisdiction of a tribunal of the District, either expressly or by defending on the merits of the case without objecting to the jurisdiction at the first available opportunity; or

(2)

The foreign tribunal lacks or refuses to exercise jurisdiction to modify its support order or issue a new support order.

(b)

If a tribunal of the District does not modify a Convention child-support order because the order is not recognized in the District, § 46-357.08(c) applies.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 711, 63 DCR 222